Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Chapter 40

Forest Product Fairness Act

43-40-101. Short Title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Forest Product Fairness Act.”

Acts 2010, ch. 686, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 686, § 2. July 1, 2010.

43-40-102. Purpose.

The general assembly recognizes the enormous contribution that the Tennessee forest products industry makes to the state. The continued health of the industry is vital to Tennessee's economic well-being. A fair and equitable process for awarding state incentives to the forest products industry is necessary to maintain economic viability. The purpose of this chapter is to provide for a procedure that will ensure an open process for the awarding of incentives, that encourages the use of forest products but does not give an unfair advantage to one (1) segment of the forest products industry over another, and that does not put existing businesses at a competitive disadvantage.

Acts 2010, ch. 686, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 686, § 2. July 1, 2010.

43-40-103. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of agriculture;

“Forest products” include the following:

Products that are derived from woody biomass;

Forest wood waste, including residual tops and limbs of trees, unused cull trees, pre-commercial thinnings, and wood or debris from noncommercial tree species, slash or brush; and

Any wood chips or fibers or other organic substances and any inorganic substances recovered from forest wood waste or produced as byproducts of processing wood; and

“Incentives” means any tax exemption, tax credit, tax exclusion, tax deduction, rebate, investment, contract, or grant made available by the state to directly support the purchase of forest products. “Incentives” shall not mean any such benefit available under statutorily provided programs.

Acts 2010, ch. 686, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 686, § 2. July 1, 2010.

43-40-104. Incentives.

Incentives to directly support the purchase of forest products shall be approved by the commissioner through a fair and equitable process prior to being awarded. The process shall be open to individuals and both new and existing partnerships, corporations, associations, or other legal entities.

Acts 2010, ch. 686, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 686, § 2. July 1, 2010.

43-40-105. Rules and regulations.

The commissioner of agriculture is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this chapter, after consulting with the commissioner of economic and community development. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2010, ch. 686, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 686, § 2. July 1, 2010.